Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 1

Residences of Persons With Disabilities

13-24-101. Purpose — Meaning of “person with a disability.”

It is the purpose of this part to remove any zoning obstacles which prevent persons with a disability from living in normal residential surroundings.

As used in this part, “person with a disability” does not include persons who have a mental illness and, because of such mental illness, pose a likelihood of serious harm as defined in § 33-6-501, or who have been convicted of serious criminal conduct related to such mental illness.

Acts 1978, ch. 863, § 1; 1979, ch. 361, §§ 1, 3; T.C.A., § 13-2401; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 8B, 8C; 2011, ch. 47, §§ 8, 9; 2011, ch. 158, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation, which amended subsections (a) and (b), shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Cross-References. County zoning regulations, title 13, ch. 7, part 1.

Municipal zoning regulations, title 13, ch. 7, part 2; § 13-7-401.

13-24-102. Homes in which persons with disabilities reside classified as single family residence.

For the purposes of any zoning law in Tennessee, the classification “single family residence” includes any home in which eight (8) or fewer unrelated persons with disabilities reside, and may include three (3) additional persons acting as support staff or guardians, who need not be related to each other or to any of the persons with disabilities residing in the home.

Acts 1978, ch. 863, § 2; 1979, ch. 361, § 2; T.C.A., § 13-2402; Acts 1999, ch. 204, § 1; 2011, ch. 47, § 10; 2011, ch. 158, § 9.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 10, effective July 1, 2011, purported to substitute “support staff” for “houseparents”. Acts 2011, ch. 158, § 9, effective May 5, 2011, had already made the substitution; therefore, ch. 47 was not given effect.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in this legislation, which amended this section, shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which is July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of this act, which amended this section, are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of this act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

13-24-103. Precedence over other laws.

This part takes precedence over any provision in any zoning law or ordinance in Tennessee to the contrary.

Acts 1978, ch. 863, § 2; T.C.A., § 13-2403.

13-24-104. Inapplicability to commercial residences for persons with disabilities.

This part does not apply to such family residences wherein persons with disabilities reside when such residences are operated on a commercial basis.

Acts 1978, ch. 863, § 2; T.C.A., § 13-2404; Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.